Hawaii, session 2026, GM1199.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. The purpose of this part is to appropriate
moneys to various entities to offset operational costs.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $4,762,987 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for
operations of the agribusiness development corporation.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the agribusiness
development corporation for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $2,592,854 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for
operations of the Hawaii technology development corporation.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii
technology development corporation for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $984,450 or so much
HB2275 CD2 LRB 26-1371-1.docx

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 2
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for
operations of the Hawaii community development authority.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii
community development authority for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 5. There is appropriated out of the mass transit
special fund the sum of $600,000,000 or so much thereof as may
be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for making disbursements
pursuant to section 248-2.7, Hawaii Revised Statutes.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
budget and finance for the purposes of the mass transit special
fund.
PART II
SECTION 6. The purpose of this part is to appropriate
moneys into and out of the major disaster fund to address
disaster recovery and response costs.
SECTION 7. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $100,000,000 or so
much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for
deposit into the major disaster fund established pursuant to
section 127A-16, Hawaii Revised Statutes.
HB2275 CD2 LRB 26-1371-1.docx 2
IWIIUlillllllilllllliNIIIIII

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 2
SECTION 8. There is appropriated out of the major disaster
fund the sum of $100,000,000 or so much thereof as may be
necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to address disaster recovery
and response costs.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii
emergency management agency for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
governor may authorize the transfer of up to $100,000,000 in
funds appropriated out of the major disaster fund pursuant to
this part to other state agencies to address disaster recovery
costs; provided that the governor, in a written determination,
specifically finds that the reallocation or use of the moneys
transferred is essential to address an imminent threat to public
health, safety, or welfare arising from the emergency; provided
further that the governor shall transmit a written notice of
that determination, including a detailed justification, to the
legislature within five days of each use of this authority, or
as soon as practicable under exigent circumstances; and provided
further that the written determination shall include the date of
transfer, the amount of the transfer, the program ID of the
program to which the funds were transferred, and an explanation
HB2275 CD2 LRB 26-1371-1.docx

Page 4
H.B. NO.
C.D. 2
of the purpose of the transfer of resources; and provided
further that any funds relating to this part that are not
expended for this purpose shall lapse to the general fund on
June 30, 2027.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the governor shall
submit to the legislature, no later than thirty days prior to
the convening of the regular session of 2027, a summary report
containing the aforementioned information for each use of this
authority for the previous twelve-month period from December 1
to November 30.
Any reallocation or use of funds pursuant to this part
shall be limited in scope and duration to that which is strictly
necessary to address the emergency, and shall terminate upon the
ending of the emergency or upon legislative action.
PART III
SECTION 10. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
HB2275 CD2 LRB 26-1371-1.docx

2275
H.B. NO
H.
S.
C.
P
P
P
X-JK
M
APPROVED this Sth day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2275, HD 1, SD 2, CD 2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 8, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2275, H.D. 1, S.D. 2, C.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 8, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate